Washington statutes.
RCW 43.216.525

Rules.

(1) The department shall adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW for the administration of the early childhood education and assistance program. Approved early childhood education and assistance programs shall conduct needs assessments of their service area and identify any targeted groups of children, to include but not be limited to children of seasonal and migrant farmworkers and native American populations living either on or off reservation. Approved early childhood education and assistance programs shall provide to the department a service delivery plan, to the extent practicable, that addresses these targeted populations.

(2) The department, in developing rules for the early childhood education and assistance program, shall consult with the early learning advisory council, and shall consider such factors as coordination with existing head start and other early childhood programs, the preparation necessary for instructors, qualifications of instructors, adequate space and equipment, and special transportation needs. The rules shall specifically require the early childhood programs to provide for parental involvement in participation with their child's program, in local program policy decisions, in development and revision of service delivery systems, and in parent education and training.

(3) By January 1, 2016, the department shall adopt rules requiring early childhood education and assistance program employees who have access to children to submit to a fingerprint background check. Fingerprint background check procedures for the early childhood education and assistance program shall be the same as the background check procedures in *RCW 43.215.215.

[ 2015 3rd sp.s. c 7 s 8; 1994 c 166 s 6; 1988 c 174 s 6; 1987 c 518 s 101; 1985 c 418 s 6. Formerly RCW 43.215.425, 28A.215.150, 28A.34A.060.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 43.215.215 was recodified as RCW 43.216.270 pursuant to 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 821, effective July 1, 2018.

Finding—Intent—2015 3rd sp.s. c 7: See note following RCW 43.216.085.

Effective date—1994 c 166: See note following RCW 43.216.500.

Findings—1994 c 166; 1988 c 174: See note following RCW 43.216.505.

Intent—1994 c 166; 1987 c 518: "The long-term social, community welfare, and economic interests of the state will be served by an investment in our children. Conclusive studies and experiences show that providing children with developmental experiences and providing parents with effective parental partnership, empowerment, opportunities for involvement with their child's developmental learning, and expanding parenting skills, learning, and training can greatly improve children's performance in school as well as increase the likelihood of children's success as adults. National studies have also confirmed that special attention to, and educational assistance for, children, their school environment, and their families are the most effective ways in which to meet the state's social and economic goals.

The legislature intends to enhance the readiness to learn of certain children and students by: Providing for an expansion of the state early childhood education and assistance program for children from low-income families and establishing an adult literacy program for certain parents; assisting school districts to establish elementary counseling programs; instituting a program to address learning problems due to drug and alcohol use and abuse; and establishing a program directed at students who leave school before graduation.

The legislature intends further to establish programs that will allow for parental, business, and community involvement in assisting the school systems throughout the state to enhance the ability of children to learn." [ 1994 c 166 s 7; 1987 c 518 s 1.]

Severability—1987 c 518: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1987 c 518 s 411.]